dicts/ia_ANY/ia.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜ

REP 8
REP c   ch
REP ch  c
REP f   ph
REP ph  f
REP r   rh
REP rh  r
REP t   th
REP th  t

PFX R Y 1
PFX R   0    re     .

SFX S Y 3
SFX S   0    s       [aeiouàáâäèéêëìíîïòóôöùúûü]
SFX S   0    es      [bdfghjklmnpqrstvwxzçñ]
SFX S   0    hes     c

SFX T Y 2
SFX T   or   rice    tor
SFX T   or   rices   tor

SFX V Y 10
SFX V   r    0       r
SFX V   r    va      r
SFX V   0    a       r
SFX V   0    ea      r
SFX V   r    nte     [ae]r
SFX V   r    ntes    [ae]r
SFX V   r    ente    ir
SFX V   r    entes   ir
SFX V   r    te      [ai]r
SFX V   er   ite     er

SFX A Y 23
SFX A   0    s       [aeiouàáâäèéêëìíîïòóôöùúûü]
SFX A   0    es      [bdfghjklmnpqrstvwxzçñ]
SFX A   0    hes     c
SFX A   0    mente   [^c]
SFX A   0    amente  c
SFX A   a    issime  a
SFX A   e    issime  [^i]e
SFX A   e    ssime   ie
SFX A   0    ssime   i
SFX A   0    hissime c
SFX A   0    issime  [^aeic]
SFX A   a    issimo  a
SFX A   e    issimo  [^i]e
SFX A   e    ssimo   ie
SFX A   0    ssimo   i
SFX A   0    hissimo c
SFX A   0    issimo  [^aeic]
SFX A   a    issimemente  a
SFX A   e    issimemente  [^i]e
SFX A   e    ssimemente   ie
SFX A   0    ssimemente   i
SFX A   0    hissimemente c
SFX A   0    issimemente  [^aeic]

SFX D Y 6
SFX D   a    issimo  a
SFX D   e    issimo  [^i]e
SFX D   e    ssimo   ie
SFX D   0    ssimo   i
SFX D   0    hissimo c
SFX D   0    issimo  [^aeic]

SFX P Y 10
SFX P   0    s       [e]
SFX P   e    a       [e]
SFX P   e    as      [e]
SFX P   e    o       [e]
SFX P   e    os      [e]
SFX P   0    es      [^e]
SFX P   0    a       [^e]
SFX P   0    as      [^e]
SFX P   0    o       [^e]
SFX P   0    os      [^e]

SFX O Y 2
SFX O   e    o       e
SFX O   e    os      e

SFX U Y 4
SFX U   0    s       [^sxzhy]
SFX U   0    es      [sxzh]
SFX U   0    s       [aeiou]y
SFX U   y    ies     [^aeiou]y
