dicts/ia_ANY/ia.dic
Lord/U
absolutor/ST
abusar/V
acclamation/S
accommodator/ST
accostumar/VR
accusar/VR
acquiribile/AR
acquiritor/STR
acquisition/SR
acre/AU
acrobatic/A
actionar/V
adaptabile/AR
adaptar/VR
adjudicator/ST
adjustabile/AR
adjustamento/SR
admiration/S
admission/SR
admonitor/ST
adoptar/VR
adornar/V
adressar/VR
adulterator/ST
aerolitic/A
affiliate/AR
affirmar/VR
affixar/VR
ager/V
aggravator/ST
agrimensura/S
alcun/P
ale/U
alicun/P
alienator/ST
allegre/A
alliar/VR
allongar/V
amabilitate/S
amateur/U
analoge/A
analysator/ST
anathematisar/V
angiographia/S
anthropologic/A
ape/S
aperir/VR
aperitor/ST
apparentar/V
apparition/SR
appetibile/A
applicabilitate/SR
application/SR
appreciator/ST
apprension/SR
arbitrar/V
archetto/S
argentator/ST
argyranthe/A
ascension/SR
asepsis/S
assaltar/V
assaltator/ST
assertion/SR
assertor/ST
assimilabile/AR
association/SR
atomic/A
attaccabile/AR
attachar/VR
attribuer/V
auditor/ST
avuncular/A
baby/U
balanciamento/S
balbutiar/V
banchettator/ST
baptisator/STR
bar/U
bavaro/S
beefsteak/U
ben/DS
benefactor/ST
benzoic/A
biber/SV
bill/U
billionesime/O
bison/S
bit/U
blasphemator/ST
bluff/U
bobsleigh/U
book-maker/U
boomerang/U
boric/A
boxator/ST
brandy/U
bravar/V
brigadero/S
brougham/U
buffet/U
burlator/ST
caddie/U
calcario/S
calfatar/V
caliciforme/A
cannonada/S
carcerar/V
cargamento/SR
carillonamento/S
carillonator/ST
carnose/A
catranator/S
causator/ST
cenar/V
centesime/O
centrifuge/A
cercator/ST
cerussa/S
champion/U
cigarretta/S
cinesthetic/A
cinquanta-none/O
cinquanta-novesime/O
cinquanta-octave/O
cinquanta-octesime/O
cinquanta-prime/O
cinquanta-quarte/O
cinquanta-quinte/O
cinquanta-secunde/O
cinquanta-septime/O
cinquanta-sexte/O
cinquanta-tertie/O
cinquantesime/O
circumcider/V
clarificator/ST
classificar/VR
clearing/U
clown/U
coalisar/V
cocaina/S
cocktail/U
codificator/SR
coimperator/ST
cold-cream/U
collateral/A
colonisator/ATS
combination/SR
commandar/V
commatre/S
commentator/ST
commodore/U
completar/V
compositor/ST
compressibilitate/SR
compressive/AR
comprimer/VR
concubinage/S
condensation/SR
condimentar/V
confabulator/ST
confirmar/VR
congestive/A
congruer/V
conquesta/SR
consecrar/VR
consecrator/ST
consiliero/S
consolator/ST
consolidar/VR
construer/V
consultor/ST
contagiose/A
contamination/SR
contemptor/ST
contraventor/ST
contribuer/V
contumacia/S
coordinator/ST
copyright/U
corinthie/A
correlatar/V
corrosion/S
cotutor/ST
cretacee/A
crocus/S
crystallisar/VR
crystallisation/SR
cuneator/ST
cyclamino/S
cyclic/A
debitar/V
dece-none/O
dece-novesime/O
dece-octave/O
dece-octesime/O
dece-prime/O
dece-quarte/O
dece-quinte/O
dece-secunde/O
dece-septime/O
dece-sexte/O
dece-tertie/O
deceptor/ST
decime/O
decoration/SR
decretal/S
defector/ST
defendibile/A
defilar/V
definition/SR
delator/ST
demobilisar/V
demonstrator/ST
denudation/S
deponer/VR
deprecator/ST
derailar/V
derby/U
derisori/A
description/SR
designator/ST
determination/SR
detractor/ST
detraher/V
diagonal/AS
dictator/ST
diffuse/A
dimitter/V
disbuccar/V
discassage/S
discoperir/V
disdignose/A
disgratiar/V
dismacular/V
dismoralisator/ST
dispersar/V
dissection/S
dissociar/V
distachabile/AR
distinguite/A
distribution/SR
distributor/STR
divinar/V
dominator/ST
drama/S
dreadnought/U
dumping/U
duodecime/O
dynamoelectric/A
ebenisar/V
eder/VR
effractor/ST
eligibile/A
eloquer/V
emancipator/ST
emergentia/SR
encyclopedismo/S
eolithic/A
equalar/V
equipar/VR
escalation/S
esser/SV
estranier/A
eveliar/VR
evulsion/S
exacerbar/V
exaggerator/ST
examine/SR
exhauste/A
exheredar/V
expiator/ST
explanar/VR
exploitar/V
expressionista/S
exterminator/ST
extirpabile/A
facturar/V
fasto/S
feminin/A
ferrator/ST
ferry-boat/U
festar/V
filiola/S
filtrar/VR
flammee/A
flautar/V
flirt/U
forcipe/S
forfeit/U
formator/ST
formular/VR
fox-trot/U
fragmentar/V
francophobe/A
frite/AR
fugitivo/S
funger/V
galician/A
galopo/S
gangster/U
generator/ST
geopolitic/A
germanisar/V
germanistica/S
gigabit/U
goal-keeper/U
graffo/S
granuliforme/A
grizzly/U
groom/U
grunnitor/ST
guarnir/V
gusto/S
handicap/U
heliocentric/A
heptametro/S
hereditar/V
hirsute/A
home/U
horripilation/S
hydraulic/A
iceberg/U
iconographia/S
idealisator/ST
ignition/SR
illiberal/A
illusionar/V
imbarcation/SR
immersion/SR
impalear/V
imperative/A
imperfectibilitate/S
importator/ST
inacceptabile/A
inaugurar/V
incivilitate/S
incommodante/A
incommodar/V
incorporation/SR
independente/A
indorsator/ST
inequalitate/S
inexecutabile/A
infarinar/V
inflar/VR
ingenue/A
ingrassiar/V
inhalar/VR
inquadrator/ST
inquisitor/ST
insablar/V
insecur/A
inseniar/VR
inspectar/VR
inspiration/SR
institutor/ST
instruer/VR
intabular/V
intercutanee/A
interessato/S
interrar/VR
interviewar/V
interviewer/U
intimidator/ST
introduction/SR
inutilisabile/A
investir/VR
involver/VR
iodoformo/S
irresolute/A
jentar/SV
jubilator/ST
jujube/S
juratori/A
jury/U
kilobit/U
lancha/S
lapidificar/V
lasse/A
leccator/ST
leporide/S
lift/U
lignicole/A
lividitate/S
livration/SR
lumbrical/A
lunch/U
lynchator/ST
madrigal/S
malfacer/V
malfaciente/A
mantelletto/S
match/U
matinal/A
me/O
mecenate/S
mediator/ST
meeting/U
mercabile/A
mercar/V
message/S
mesurar/VR
mie/P
millesime/O
milliardesime/O
millionesime/O
miniatura/S
minoan/A
miscer/VR
monographo/S
monomie/A
morir/V
mortificator/ST
multisense/A
munificentia/S
mustang/U
naumachia/S
navigabile/A
nde/O
ne/O
negotiabilitate/SR
nodositate/S
nomenclator/ST
nomic/A
none/O
notification/SR
novanta-none/O
novanta-novesime/O
novanta-octave/O
novanta-octesime/O
novanta-prime/O
novanta-quarte/O
novanta-secunde/O
novanta-sexte/O
novantesime/O
nuclear/V
nylon/U
obsolete/A
obstetrice/S
obtenibile/AR
octanta-none/O
octanta-octave/O
octanta-prime/O
octanta-quinte/O
octanta-septime/O
octanta-tertie/O
octave/O
octogesime/O
opalescente/A
operator/ST
opossum/S
opponer/VR
ornar/V
ossute/A
osteotomia/S
pacificator/ST
paddock/U
panification/S
papabile/A
partialitate/S
pathognomonic/A
patruliar/V
pectinator/ST
pedigree/U
pentaphylle/A
perverse/A
pervertitor/ST
phenylo/S
photolithographiar/V
physiognomic/A
pick-up/U
picnic/U
plaid/U
planificar/VR
pleura/S
plumbifere/A
pointer/U
popularisar/VR
portabile/A
portrait/U
postponer/V
praticultor/ST
precarietate/S
presbyterian/A
prestigiator/ST
pretender/V
prognosticator/ST
prohibitori/A
prophetia/S
prosecution/SR
protuberar/V
provocator/ST
psalmic/A
publication/SR
pullman/U
quadrillionesime/O
quaker/U
qualcun/P
quaranta-novesime/O
quaranta-octesime/O
quaranta-quarte/O
quaranta-secunde/O
quaranta-sexte/O
quarantesime/O
quarte/O
quarteron/S
quinte/O
radioactive/A
raid/U
railway/U
raper/V
reclamator/ST
record/U
recordar/V
rectificar/VR
reflexibilitate/S
reimplaciar/V
relator/ST
replicar/V
reporter/U
reprobator/ST
reproductive/A
retorta/S
retraher/V
revocator/ST
rude/A
saccharar/V
sacrificator/ST
sagittaria/S
sandwich/U
scoliose/A
scout/U
secularista/S
secunde/O
seder/V
seminator/ST
septanta-none/O
septanta-octave/O
septanta-prime/O
septanta-quinte/O
septanta-septime/O
septanta-tertie/O
septime/O
sexanta-none/O
sexanta-octave/O
sexanta-prime/O
sexanta-quinte/O
sexanta-septime/O
sexanta-tertie/O
sexte/O
shampooing/U
shrapnel/U
siccar/VR
sicilian/A
sitiologia/S
skunk/U
slogan/U
smoking/U
solidarisar/V
solidification/SR
sonator/ST
speech/U
splenic/A
stand/U
stannator/S
starter/U
steeplechase/U
stimular/VR
stock/U
stoppar/V
studiar/VR
subjugator/ST
succose/A
sue/P
sufflar/V
suffragette/U
sultanato/S
superchip/U
suspirator/ST
systematisar/V
tank/U
taxabile/A
telephonista/S
terabit/U
tertie/O
testificator/ST
tic/U
toast/U
toddy/U
torpedinar/V
torpedinero/S
torte/A
tory/U
trade-union/U
traducer/VR
tramway/U
translatar/VR
travaliator/ST
trenta-none/O
trenta-octave/O
trenta-prime/O
trenta-quinte/O
trenta-septime/O
trenta-tertie/O
trilliardesime/O
trottar/V
trottoir/U
trust/U
tue/P
tulipaniero/S
turf/U
tyrrhen/A
un/P
ve/O
vegetal/AS
vehiculo/S
velar/AV
venator/ST
verificar/VR
vincitor/ST
vinti-none/O
vinti-octave/O
vinti-prime/O
vinti-quinte/O
vinti-septime/O
vinti-tertie/O
visualisar/VR
vitiose/A
vitrina/S
vomitar/V
vulgarisator/ST
water-closet/U
weekend/U
whisky/U
yacht/U
émailliar/VR
